South Dakota, session 2026, SB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-1:
For purposes of this title, "nonpublic school" means an institution or entity, under
the supervision and control of a governing body other than a publicly-elected board, as
defined in § 13-8-1, which is created and operated by an individual, organization, or group
of individuals, for the purposes of instructing children who are of compulsory school age,
as defined in § 13-27-1, in at least the fundamentals of mathematics and the English
language. Any instruction in the English language offered by the nonpublic school must
be provided in a way that leads to a mastery of the English language.
A nonpublic school may:
(1) Limit enrollment to the school;
(2) Charge tuition;
(3) Receive federal or state revenues in the form of a grant, subsidy, or a special
appropriation; and
(4) Receive services from a school district.
A nonpublic school is not assigned a geographic territory from which it may receive
publicly collected tax revenue. A nonpublic school is not eligible to receive state aid to
education distributed under chapter 13-13.
A nonpublic school may be accredited by the Department of Education or another
institutional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education
but is not required to be so. Any teacher employed by a nonaccredited nonpublic school
is not required to be certified pursuant to chapter 13-42.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.